Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.84.030

Ex officio collector of code city taxes.

The treasurer of the county wherein a code city is situated shall be the ex officio collector of such code city's taxes and give bond, and account for the city's funds as provided in chapter 36.29 RCW.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.84.030.]